Utah statutes.
17-25-1.   General powers and duties.
(1)  Every constable shall:
(a)  attend the justice courts within his city or county when required by
contract or court order; and
(b)  execute, serve, and return all process directed or delivered to him by a
judge of the justice court serving the city or county, or by any competent
authority within the limits of this section.
(2)  Any constable may serve any process throughout the state.
